test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-odd_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Oddsyllable nouns belonging to MALIS, SEAMU, GAHPIR, BOAHTIN

Tests:
  Noun - eappir: # MALIS
    eappir+N+Sg+Nom: eappir
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen: eabbára
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: eabbáreame
    eappir+N+Sg+Acc: eabbára
    eappir+N+Sg+Ill: eabbárii
    eappir+N+Sg+Loc: eabbáris
    eappir+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: eabbáristtán
    eappir+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: eabbáristtát
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: eabbáriinnán
    eappir+N+Ess: eappirin
    eappir+N+Pl+Nom: eabbárat
    eappir+N+Pl+Gen: eabbáriid
    eappir+N+Pl+Acc: eabbáriid
    eappir+N+Pl+Ill: eabbáriidda
    eappir+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: eabbáriiddásat
    eappir+N+Pl+Loc: eabbáriin
    eappir+N+Pl+Com: eabbáriiguin
    eappir+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: eabbáriiddámeguin
    eappir+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: eabbáraš
    eappir+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: [eabbáraččas, eabbáraččan]
    eappir+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: eappirlažžan
    
  Noun - guora: # SEAMU
    guora+N+Sg+Nom: guora
    guora+N+Sg+Gen: guorraga
    guora+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorrageame
    guora+N+Sg+Acc: guorraga
    guora+N+Sg+Ill: guorragii
    guora+N+Sg+Loc: guorragis
    guora+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: guorragisttán
    guora+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: guorragisttát
    guora+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: guorragiinnán
    guora+N+Pl+Acc: guorragiid
    guora+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: guorragiiddásat
    guora+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorragiiddámeguin
    guora+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guorragaš
    guora+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: [guorragaččas, guorragaččan]
    guora+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: guoralažžan

  Noun - guorbban: # GAHPIR
    guorbban+N+Sg+Nom: guorbban
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen: guorbbana
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorbbaneame
    guorbban+N+Sg+Acc: guorbban
    guorbban+N+Sg+Ill: guorbbanii
    guorbban+N+Sg+Loc: guorbbanis
    guorbban+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: guorbbanisttán
    guorbban+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: guorbbanisttát
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: guorbbaniinnán
    guorbban+N+Pl+Acc: guorbbaniid
    guorbban+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: guorbbaniiddásat
    guorbban+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorbbaniiddámeguin
    guorbban+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guorbbanaš
    guorbban+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: [guorbbanaččas, guorbbanaččan]
    guorbban+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: guorbbanlažžan

  Noun - fierdin: # BOAHTIN
    fierdin+Sg+Nom: fierdin
    fierdin+Sg+Gen: [fierdin, fierdima]
    fierdin+Sg+Acc: fierdima
    fierdin+Sg+Ill: fierdimii
    fierdin+Sg+Loc: fierdimis
    fierdin+Pl+Acc: fierdimiid
    fierdin+Pl+Com: fierdimiiguin
